California statutes. Business and Professions Code
This section does not prohibit the acceptance of evaluation specimens for proficiency testing or referral of specimens or such assignment from one clinical laboratory to another clinical laboratory, either licensed or exempt under this chapter, providing the report indicates clearly the laboratory performing the test.

“Proprietary interest” does not include ownership of a building where space is leased to a clinical laboratory at the prevailing rate under a straight lease arrangement.

A violation of this section is a public offense and is punishable upon a first conviction by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. A second or subsequent conviction shall be punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

654.2.

(a) It is unlawful for any person licensed under this division or under any initiative act referred to in this division to charge, bill, or otherwise solicit payment from a patient on behalf of, or refer a patient to, an organization in which the licensee, or the licensee’s immediate family, has a significant beneficial interest, unless the licensee first discloses in writing to the patient, that there is such an interest and advises the patient that the patient may choose any organization for the purpose of obtaining the services ordered or requested by the licensee.

(b) The disclosure requirements of subdivision (a) may be met by posting a conspicuous sign in an area which is likely to be seen by all patients who use the facility or by providing those patients with a written disclosure statement. Where referrals, billings, or other solicitations are between licensees who contract with multispecialty clinics pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code or who conduct their practice as members of the same professional corporation or partnership, and the services are rendered on the same physical premises, or under the same professional corporation or partnership name, the requirements of subdivision (a) may be met by posting a conspicuous disclosure statement at a single location which is a common area or registration area or by providing those patients with a written disclosure statement.

(c) On and after July 1, 1987, persons licensed under this division or under any initiative act referred to in this division shall disclose in writing to any third-party payer for the patient, when requested by the payer, organizations in which the licensee, or any member of the licensee’s immediate family, has a significant beneficial interest and to which patients are referred. The third-party payer shall not request this information from the provider more than once a year.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to serve as the sole basis for the denial or delay of payment of claims by third party payers.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Immediate family” includes the spouse and children of the licensee, the parents of the licensee and licensee’s spouse, and the spouses of the children of the licensee.

(2) “Significant beneficial interest” means any financial interest that is equal to or greater than the lesser of the following:

(A) Five percent of the whole.

(B) Five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(3) A third-party payer includes any health care service plan, self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, disability insurer, nonprofit hospital service plan, or private group or indemnification insurance program.

A third party payer does not include a prepaid capitated plan licensed under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 or Chapter 11a (commencing with Section 11491) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(e) This section shall not apply to a “significant beneficial interest” which is limited to ownership of a building where the space is leased to the organization at the prevailing rate under a straight lease agreement or to any interest held in publicly traded stocks.

(f) (1) This section does not prohibit the acceptance of evaluation specimens for proficiency testing or referral of specimens or assignment from one clinical laboratory to another clinical laboratory, either licensed or exempt under this chapter, if the report indicates clearly the name of the laboratory performing the test.

(2) This section shall not apply to relationships governed by other provisions of this article nor is this section to be construed as permitting relationships or interests that are prohibited by existing law on the effective date of this section.

(3) The disclosure requirements of this section shall not be required to be given to any patient, customer, or his or her representative, if the licensee, organization, or entity is providing or arranging for health care services pursuant to a prepaid capitated contract with the State Department of Health Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 881, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

654.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Arrange for” and “establish” mean the act of a licensee, or an employee or agent of that licensee, receiving application information from the applicant and submitting it to the lender for approval or rejection. 

(2) “Deferred interest provision” means a contractual provision that allows for interest to be charged on portions of the original balance that have already been paid off.

(3) “Licensee” means an individual, firm, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, or cooperative association licensed under this division
 or under any initiative act or division referred to in this division.

(4) “Licensee’s office” means either of the following:

(A) An office of a licensee in solo practice.

(B) An office in which services or goods are personally provided by the licensee or by employees in that office, or personally by independent contractors in that office, in accordance with law. Employees and independent contractors shall be licensed or certified when licensure or certification is required by law.

(5) “Open-end credit” means credit extended by a creditor under a plan in which the creditor reasonably contemplates repeated transactions, the creditor may impose a finance charge from time to time on an outstanding unpaid balance, and the amount of credit that may be
 extended to the debtor during the term of the plan, up to any limit set by the creditor, is generally made available to the extent that any outstanding balance is repaid.

(6) (A) “Patient” includes, but is not limited to, the patient’s parent or other legal representative.

(B) In veterinary medical settings, “patient” means one of the following, as indicated by context:

(i) If the patient is receiving the services, the owned animal of a client.

(ii) If the patient is agreeing to or paying for services, the client owner of an animal patient.

(b) (1) It is unlawful for a licensee, or employee or agent of that licensee,
 to arrange for or establish an open-end credit or loan that contains a deferred interest provision.

(2) This subdivision shall not be construed as prohibiting a licensee, or employee or agent of a licensee, from doing any of the following:

(A) Charging treatment or costs to an open-end credit or loan that is lawfully extended by a third party, including those that contain deferred interest provisions.

(B) Arranging for or establishing an open-end credit or loan that does any of the following:

(i) Offers a promotional period during which a debtor may avoid the payment of interest in connection with an open-end credit plan.

(ii) At the end of a promotional period, charges interest on any
 unpaid balance remaining at that time.

(iii) Imposes a late fee on a debtor who fails to pay the minimum amount due during any payment period.

(c) (1) It is unlawful for a licensee, or employee or agent of that licensee, to charge treatment or costs to an open-end credit or loan, that is extended by a third party and that is arranged for, or established in, that licensee’s office, more than 30 days before the date upon which the treatment is rendered or costs are incurred.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to orthodontic treatment provided by a licensed dentist who may charge incremental fees throughout the course of treatment.

(d) It is unlawful for a licensee, or employee or agent of that licensee, to charge treatment or costs
 to an open-end credit or loan that is extended by a third party and that is arranged for, or established in, that licensee’s office without first providing the patient with a treatment plan, as required by subdivision (h), and a list of which treatment and services are being charged in advance of rendering treatment or incurring costs.

(e) It is unlawful for a licensee, or employee or agent of a licensee, to complete any portion of an application for credit or a loan extended by a third party for the patient or otherwise arrange for or establish an application that is not completely filled out by the patient.

(f) A licensee shall, within 15 business days of a patient’s request, refund to the lender any payment received through credit or a loan extended by a third party that is arranged for, or established in, that licensee’s office for treatment that has not been rendered or costs
 that have not been incurred.

(g) A licensee, or an employee or agent of that licensee, shall not arrange for or establish credit or a loan extended by a third party for a patient without first providing the following written or electronic notice, on one page or screen, respectively, in at least 14-point type, and obtaining a signature from the patient:

“Credit or Loan for Health Care Services

The attached application and information is for a credit card or loan to help you pay for your health care treatment. You should know that:

You are applying for a ____ credit card or a ____ loan for $____.

You do not have to apply for the credit card or the loan. You may request a different place and additional time to review, fill out, and sign the application. You may pay your health
 care provider for treatment in another manner.

This credit card or loan is not a payment plan with the provider’s office. It is credit with, or a loan made by, [name of company issuing the credit card or loan]. Your health care provider does not work for this company.

Before applying for this credit card or loan, you have the right to a written treatment plan from your health care provider. This plan must include the expected treatment to be provided and the estimated costs of each service. If you have insurance, the treatment plan must tell you how much your insurance is expected to cover. If you are a Medi-Cal patient seeking services from a Medi-Cal provider, your treatment plan must tell you if Medi-Cal will cover a different service to treat your condition. If you only want services covered by Medi-Cal, you should not sign up for this credit card or loan.

Your health care
 provider cannot charge your credit card or loan account before you start treatment.

You have the right to have your credit card or loan account refunded for any charges for treatment you did not get. However, your provider does not have to refund the amount they spent to prepare for your treatment. Your health care provider must refund the amount of the charges to the lender within 15 business days of your request. The lender must take refunded charges off your account.

Please read carefully the terms and conditions of this credit card or loan.

You may be required to pay interest rates on the amount charged to the credit card or the amount of the loan. If you pay late, you may have to pay a penalty and a higher interest rate.

You may use this credit card or loan to pay for future health care services.

If you do not pay the money that you owe on the credit card or loan, your missed payments can be reported and could hurt your credit rating. You could also be sued.

[Patient’s Signature]”

(h) Before arranging for or establishing credit or a loan extended by a third party, a licensee shall give a patient a written treatment plan that complies with all of the following:

(1) The treatment plan shall include each anticipated service to be provided and the estimated cost of each service.

(2) If a patient is covered by a private or government medical benefit plan or medical insurance from which the licensee takes assignment of benefits, the treatment plan shall indicate the patient’s private or government-estimated share of cost for each
 service.

(3) If the licensee accepts Medi-Cal, the treatment plan for a Medi-Cal patient shall indicate if Medi-Cal would cover an alternate, medically necessary service as defined in Section 14059.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The treatment plan shall indicate that the Medi-Cal patient has a right to ask for only services covered by Medi-Cal and that the licensee agrees to follow Medi-Cal rules to secure Medi-Cal covered services before treatment.

(4) If the licensee does not take assignment of benefits from a patient’s medical benefit plan or insurance, the treatment plan shall indicate that the treatment may or may not be covered by a patient’s medical benefit or insurance plan, and that the patient has the right to confirm medical benefit or insurance information from the patient’s plan, insurer, or employer before beginning treatment.

(i) A licensee, or an employee or agent of that licensee, shall not arrange for or establish credit or a loan extended by a third party for a patient with whom the licensee, or an employee or agent of that licensee, communicates primarily in a language other than English that is one of the Medi-Cal threshold languages, unless the written notice information required by subdivision (g) is also provided in that language.

(j) (1) A licensee, or an employee or agent of that licensee, shall not arrange for or establish credit or a loan that is extended by a third party for a patient under either of the following circumstances:

(A) The patient has been administered or is under the influence of general anesthesia, conscious sedation, or nitrous oxide.

(B) The patient is in a treatment area, including, but not limited to, an exam room, surgical room, or other area where medical treatment is administered, unless the patient agrees to fill out and sign the application to arrange for or establish credit or a loan in the treatment area.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to veterinary medicine. Any credit or loan application offered to an owner of an animal shall be filled out by the owner.

(k) A patient who suffers any damage as a result of the use or employment by any person of a method, act, or practice that willfully violates this section may seek the relief provided by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1780) of Title 1.5 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(l) The rights, remedies, and penalties set forth in this article are cumulative, and
 shall not supersede the rights, remedies, or penalties established under other laws.

(m) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 856, Sec. 2.   (SB 639)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

655.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Health plan” means a health care service plan licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) “Optical company” means a person or entity that is engaged in the manufacture, sale, or distribution to physicians and surgeons, optometrists, health plans, or dispensing opticians of lenses, frames, optical supplies, or optometric appliances or devices or kindred products.

(3) “Optometrist” means a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3000) or an optometric corporation, as described in Section 3160.

(4) “Physician and surgeon” means a person licensed by the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) or a medical corporation that is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code.

(5) “Registered dispensing optician” means a person or entity licensed pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 2550).

(6) “Therapeutic ophthalmic product” means lenses or other products that provide direct treatment of eye disease or visual rehabilitation
 for diseased eyes.

(b) No optometrist may have any membership, proprietary interest, coownership, or any profit-sharing arrangement, either by stock ownership, interlocking directors, trusteeship, mortgage, or trust deed, with any registered dispensing optician or any optical company, except as otherwise permitted under this section.

(c) (1) A registered dispensing optician or an optical company may operate, own, or have an ownership interest in a health plan so long as the health plan does not directly employ optometrists to provide optometric services directly to enrollees of the health plan, and may directly or indirectly provide products and services to the health plan or its contracted providers or enrollees or to other optometrists. For purposes of this
 section, an optometrist may be employed by a health plan as a clinical director for the health plan pursuant to Section 1367.01 of the Health and Safety Code or to perform services related to utilization management or quality assurance or other similar related services that do not require the optometrist to directly provide health care services to enrollees. In addition, an optometrist serving as a clinical director may not employ optometrists to provide health care services to enrollees of the health plan for which the optometrist is serving as clinical director. For the purposes of this section, the health plan’s utilization management and quality assurance programs that are consistent with the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) do not constitute providing health care services to enrollees.

(2) The registered dispensing optician or optical company shall not interfere with the professional judgment of the optometrist.

(3) The Department of Managed Health Care shall forward to the California State Board of Optometry any complaints received from consumers that allege that an optometrist violated the Optometry Practice Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3000)). The Department of Managed Health Care and the California State Board of Optometry shall enter into an Inter-Agency Agreement regarding the sharing of information related to the services provided by an optometrist that may be in violation of the Optometry Practice Act that the Department of Managed Health Care encounters in the course of the administration of the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975
 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(d) An optometrist, a registered dispensing optician, a physician and surgeon, an optical company, or a health plan may execute a lease, sublease, or other written agreement with an optometrist, if all of the following conditions are contained in a written agreement establishing the landlord-tenant relationship:

(1) (A) The practice shall be owned by the optometrist and in every phase be under the optometrist’s exclusive control, including the selection and supervision of optometric staff, the scheduling of patients, the amount of time the optometrist spends with patients, fees charged for optometric products and services, the examination procedures and treatment
 provided to patients, and the optometrist’s contracting with managed care organizations.

(B) Subparagraph (A) shall not preclude a lease from including commercially reasonable terms that: (i) require the provision of optometric services at the leased space during certain days and hours, (ii) restrict the leased space from being used for the sale or offer for sale of spectacles, frames, lenses, contact lenses, or other ophthalmic products, except that the optometrist shall be permitted to sell therapeutic ophthalmic products if the registered dispensing optician, physician and surgeon, health plan, or optical company located on or adjacent to the optometrist’s leased space does not offer any substantially similar therapeutic ophthalmic products for sale, (iii) require the optometrist to contract with a health plan network, health plan, or health
 insurer, or (iv) permit the landlord to directly or indirectly provide furnishings and equipment in the leased space.

(2) The optometrist’s records shall be the sole property of the optometrist. Only the optometrist and those persons with written authorization from the optometrist shall have access to the patient records and the examination room, except as otherwise provided by law.

(3) The optometrist’s leased space shall be definite and distinct from space occupied by other occupants of the premises, have a sign designating that the leased space is occupied by an independent optometrist or optometrists and be accessible to the optometrist after hours or in the case of an emergency, subject to the facility’s general accessibility. This paragraph shall not require a
 separate entrance to the optometrist’s leased space.

(4) All signs and displays shall be separate and distinct from that of the other occupants and shall have the optometrist’s name and the word “optometrist” prominently displayed in connection therewith. This paragraph shall not prohibit the optometrist from advertising the optometrist’s practice location with reference to other occupants or prohibit the optometrist or registered dispensing optician from advertising their participation in any health plan’s network or the health plan’s products in which the optometrist or registered dispensing optician participates.

(5) There shall be no signs displayed on any part of the premises or in any advertising indicating that the optometrist is employed or controlled by the registered
 dispensing optician, health plan, or optical company.

(6) Except for a statement that an independent doctor of optometry is located in the leased space, in-store pricing signs and as otherwise permitted by this subdivision, the registered dispensing optician or optical company shall not link its advertising with the optometrist’s name, practice, or fees.

(7) Notwithstanding paragraphs (4) and (6), this subdivision shall not preclude a health plan from advertising its health plan products and associated premium costs and any copayments, coinsurance, deductibles, or other forms of cost sharing, or the names and locations of the health plan’s providers, including any optometrists or registered dispensing opticians that provide professional services, in compliance with the Knox-Keene
 Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(8) A health plan that advertises its products and services in accordance with paragraph (7) shall not advertise the optometrist’s fees for products and services that are not included in the health
 plan’s contract with the optometrist.

(9) The optometrist shall not be precluded from collecting fees for services that are not included in a health plan’s products and services, subject to any patient disclosure requirements contained in the health plan’s provider agreement with the optometrist or that are not otherwise prohibited by the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(10) The term of the lease shall be no less than one year and shall not require the optometrist to contract exclusively with a health plan. The optometrist may terminate the lease according to the terms of the lease. The landlord may terminate the lease for the following reasons:

(A) The optometrist’s failure to maintain a license to practice
 optometry or the imposition of restrictions, suspension or revocation of the optometrist’s license, or if the optometrist or the optometrist’s employee is or becomes ineligible to participate in state or federal government-funded programs.

(B) Termination of any underlying lease where the optometrist has subleased space, or the optometrist’s failure to comply with the underlying lease provisions that are made applicable to the optometrist.

(C) If the health plan is the landlord, the termination of the provider agreement between the health plan and the optometrist, in accordance with the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(D) Other reasons pursuant to the terms of the lease or permitted under the Civil Code.

(11) The landlord shall act in good faith in terminating the lease and in no case shall the landlord terminate the lease for reasons that constitute interference with the practice of optometry.

(12) Lease or rent terms and payments shall not be based on number of eye exams performed, prescriptions written, patient
 referrals, or the sale or promotion of the products of a registered dispensing optician or an optical company.

(13) The landlord shall not terminate the lease solely because of a report, complaint, or allegation filed by the optometrist against the landlord, a registered dispensing optician, or a health plan, to the California State Board of Optometry or the Department of Managed Health Care or any law enforcement or regulatory agency.

(14) The landlord shall provide the optometrist with written notice of the scheduled expiration date of a lease at least 60 days prior to the scheduled expiration date. This notice obligation shall not affect the ability of either party to terminate the lease pursuant to this section. The landlord may not interfere with an outgoing optometrist’s
 efforts to inform the optometrist’s patients, in accordance with customary practice and professional obligations, of the relocation of the optometrist’s practice.

(15) The California State Board of Optometry may inspect, upon request, an individual lease agreement pursuant to its investigational authority, and if such a request is made, the landlord or tenant, as applicable, shall promptly comply with the request. Failure or refusal to comply with the request for lease agreements within 30 days of receiving the request constitutes unprofessional conduct and is grounds for disciplinary action by the appropriate regulatory agency. This section shall not affect the Department of Managed Health Care’s authority to inspect all books and records of a health plan pursuant to Section 1381 of the Health and Safety Code.

Any financial information contained in the lease submitted to a regulatory entity, pursuant to this paragraph, shall be considered confidential trade secret information that is exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(16) This subdivision shall not be applicable to the relationship between any optometrist employee and the employer medical group, or the relationship between a medical group exclusively contracted with a health plan regulated by the Department of Managed Health Care and that health plan.

(e) No registered dispensing optician may have any membership, proprietary interest, coownership, or profit-sharing arrangement either by
 stock ownership, interlocking directors, trusteeship, mortgage, or trust deed, with an optometrist, except as permitted under this section.

(f) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a person licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) or its professional corporation from contracting with or employing optometrists, ophthalmologists, or optometric assistants and entering into a contract or landlord-tenant relationship with a health plan, an optical company, or a registered dispensing optician, in accordance with Sections 650 and 654 of this code.

(g) Any violation of this section constitutes a misdemeanor as to such person licensed under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3000) of this division and as to any and all persons, whether or not so licensed under this
 division, who participate with such licensed person in a violation of any provision of this section.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding any other law and in addition to any action available to the California State Board of Optometry, the California State Board of Optometry may issue a citation containing an order of abatement, an order to pay an administrative fine, or both, to an optical company, an optometrist, or a registered dispensing optician for a violation of this section. The administrative fine shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per administrative action. Notwithstanding any other law and in addition to any action available to the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California may issue a
 citation containing an order of abatement, an order to pay an administrative fine, or both, to a physician and surgeon for a violation of this section. In assessing the amount of the fine, the board shall give due consideration to all of the following:

(A) The gravity of the violation.

(B) The good faith of the cited person or entity.

(C) The history of previous violations of the same or similar nature.

(D) Evidence that the violation was or was not willful.

(E) The extent to which the cited person or entity has cooperated with the board’s investigation.

(F) The
 extent to which the cited person or entity has mitigated or attempted to mitigate any damage or injury caused by the violation.

(G) Any other factors as justice may require.

(2) A citation or fine assessment issued pursuant to a citation shall inform the cited person or entity that if a hearing is desired to contest the finding of a violation, that hearing shall be requested by written notice to the board within 30 days of the date of issuance of the citation or assessment. If a hearing is not requested pursuant to this section, payment of any fine shall not constitute an admission of the violation charged. Hearings shall be held pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(3) The board shall adopt regulations to implement a system for the issuance of citations, administrative fines, and orders of abatement authorized by this section. The regulations shall include provisions for both of the following:

(A) The issuance of a citation without an administrative fine.

(B) The opportunity for a cited person or entity to have an informal conference with the executive officer of the board in addition to the hearing described in paragraph (2).

(4) The failure of a licensee to pay a fine within 30 days of the date of assessment, unless the citation is being appealed, may result in disciplinary action being taken by the board. Where a citation is not contested and a fine is not paid, the full
 amount of the assessed fine shall be added to the fee for renewal of the license. A license shall not be renewed without payment of the renewal fee and fine.

(5) Notwithstanding any other law, if a fine is paid to satisfy an assessment based on the finding of a violation, payment of the fine shall be represented as satisfactory resolution of the matter for purposes of public disclosure.

(i) Administrative fines collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the fund of the board that has issued the fine. It is the intent of the Legislature that moneys collected as fines and deposited in the fund be used by the board primarily for enforcement purposes.

(j) Any complaints against a physician and surgeon for
 violations of this section shall be referred to the physician and surgeon’s licensing board.

(k) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 11) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

655.2.

(a) (1) No physician and surgeon or medical corporation licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000), nor any audiologist who is not a licensed dispensing audiologist or hearing aid dispenser shall employ any individual licensed pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 2538.10) of Chapter 5.3 for the purpose of fitting or selling hearing aids.

(2) No individual licensed pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 2538.10) of Chapter 5.3 shall employ any physician and surgeon or any audiologist who is not a licensed dispensing audiologist or hearing aid dispenser, or contract with a medical corporation
 licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000), for the purpose of fitting or selling hearing aids.

(b) This section shall not apply to any physician and surgeon or medical corporation that contracts with or is affiliated with a comprehensive group practice health care service plan licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act, as set forth in Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 316, Sec. 2.   (SB 1466)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

655.5.

(a) It is unlawful for any person licensed under this division or under any initiative act referred to in this division, or any clinical laboratory, or any health facility when billing for a clinical laboratory of the facility, to charge, bill, or otherwise solicit payment from any patient, client, or customer for any clinical laboratory service not actually rendered by the person or clinical laboratory or under his, her or its direct supervision unless the patient, client, or customer is apprised at the first time of the charge, billing, or solicitation of the name, address, and charges of the clinical laboratory performing the service. The first such written charge, bill, or other solicitation of payment shall separately set forth the name,
 address, and charges of the clinical laboratory concerned and shall clearly show whether or not the charge is included in the total of the account, bill, or charge. This subdivision shall be satisfied if the required disclosures are made to the third-party payer of the patient, client, or customer. If the patient is responsible for submitting the bill for the charges to the third-party payer, the bill provided to the patient for that purpose shall include the disclosures required by this section. This subdivision shall not apply to a clinical laboratory of a health facility or a health facility when billing for a clinical laboratory of the facility nor to a person licensed under this division or under any initiative act referred to in this division if the standardized billing form used by the facility or person requires a summary entry for all clinical laboratory charges. For purposes of this subdivision, “health facility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Commencing July 1, 1994, a clinical laboratory shall provide to each of its referring providers, upon request, a schedule of fees for services provided to patients of the referring provider. The schedule shall be provided within two working days after the clinical laboratory receives the request. For the purposes of this subdivision, a “referring provider” means any provider who has referred a patient to the clinical laboratory in the preceding six-month period. Commencing July 1, 1994, a clinical laboratory that provides a list of laboratory services to a referring provider or to a potential referring provider shall include a schedule of fees for the laboratory services listed.

(c) It is also unlawful for any person licensed under this division or under any initiative act referred to in this division to charge additional charges for any clinical laboratory service that is not
 actually rendered by the licensee to the patient and itemized in the charge, bill, or other solicitation of payment. This section shall not be construed to prohibit any of the following:

(1) Any itemized charge for any service actually rendered to the patient by the licensee.

(2) Any summary charge for services actually rendered to a patient by a health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, or by a person licensed under this division or under any initiative act referred to in this division if the standardized billing form used by the facility or person requires a summary entry for all clinical laboratory charges.

(d) As used in this section, the term “any person licensed under this division” includes a person licensed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1265, all wholly
 owned subsidiaries of the person, a parent company that wholly owns the person, and any subsidiaries wholly owned by the same parent that wholly owns the person. “Wholly owned” means ownership directly or through one or more subsidiaries. This section shall not apply to billings by a person licensed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1265 when the person licensed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1265 bills for services performed by any laboratory owned or operated by the person licensed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1265.

(e) This section shall not apply to any person or clinical laboratory who or which contracts directly with a health care service plan licensed pursuant to Section 1349 of the Health and Safety Code, if the services are to be provided to members of the plan on a prepaid basis and without additional charge or liability on account thereof.

(f) A violation of this section is a public offense and is punishable upon a first conviction by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. A second or subsequent conviction is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), a violation of this section by a physician and surgeon for a first offense shall be subject to the exclusive remedy of reprimand by the Medical Board of California if the transaction that is the subject of the violation involves a charge for a clinical laboratory service that is less than the charge would have been if the clinical laboratory providing the service
 billed a patient, client, or customer directly for the clinical laboratory service, and if that clinical laboratory charge is less than the charge listed in the clinical laboratory’s schedule of fees pursuant to subdivision (b).
